Indiana, session 2026, SB215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) The following definitions apply to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is plainly
repugnant to the intent of the general assembly or of the context of the
statute:
(1) "Adult", "of full age", and "person in his majority" mean a
person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) "Attorney" includes a counselor or other person authorized to
appear and represent a party in an action or special proceeding.
(3) "Autism" means a neurological condition as described in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.
(4) "Bond" does not necessarily imply a seal.
(5) "Clerk" means the clerk of the court or a person authorized to
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


perform the clerk's duties.
(6) "Health record", "hospital record", or "medical record" means
written or printed information possessed by a provider (as defined
in IC 16-18-2-295) concerning any diagnosis, treatment, or
prognosis of the patient, unless otherwise defined. Except as
otherwise provided, the terms include mental health records and
drug and alcohol abuse records.
(7) "Highway" includes county bridges and state and county
roads, unless otherwise expressly provided.
(8) "Infant" or "minor" means a person less than eighteen (18)
years of age.
(9) "Inhabitant" may be construed to mean a resident in any place.
(10) "Judgment" means all final orders, decrees, and
determinations in an action and all orders upon which executions
may issue.
(11) "Land", "real estate", and "real property" include lands,
tenements, and hereditaments.
(12) "Mentally incompetent" means of unsound mind.
(13) "Money demands on contract", when used in reference to an
action, means an action arising out of contract when the relief
demanded is a recovery of money.
(14) "Month" means a calendar month, unless otherwise
expressed.
(15) "Noncode statute" means a statute that is not codified as part
of the Indiana Code.
(16) "Oath" includes "affirmation", and "to swear" includes to
"affirm".
(17) "Person" extends to bodies politic and corporate.
(18) "Personal property" includes goods, chattels, evidences of
debt, and things in action.
(19) "Population" has the meaning set forth in IC 1-1-3.5-3.
(20) "Preceding" and "following", referring to sections in statutes,
mean the sections next preceding or next following that in which
the words occur, unless some other section is designated.
(21) "Property" includes personal and real property.
(22) "Sex" and "gender" mean the biological classification of
male or female in the context of reproductive potential or
capacity, which is determined by sex genes, naturally
occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal
and external genitalia present at birth, without regard to an
individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience.
These terms are to be considered synonymous. This definition
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


is presumptive throughout the Indiana Code unless an
alternative definition is clearly stated.
(22) (23) "Sheriff" means the sheriff of the county or another
person authorized to perform sheriff's duties.
(23) (24) "State", applied to any one (1) of the United States,
includes the District of Columbia and the commonwealths,
possessions, states in free association with the United States, and
the territories. "United States" includes the District of Columbia
and the commonwealths, possessions, states in free association
with the United States, and the territories.
(24) (25) "Under legal disabilities" includes persons less than
eighteen (18) years of age, mentally incompetent, or out of the
United States.
(25) (26) "Verified", when applied to pleadings, means supported
by oath or affirmation in writing.
(26) (27) "Will" includes a testament and codicil.
(27) (28) "Without relief" in any judgment, contract, execution,
or other instrument of writing or record, means without the
benefit of valuation laws.
(28) (29) "Written" and "in writing" include printing,
lithographing, or other mode of representing words and letters. If
the written signature of a person is required, the terms mean the
proper handwriting of the person or the person's mark.
(29) (30) "Year" means a calendar year, unless otherwise
expressed.
(30) (31) The definitions in IC 35-31.5 apply to all statutes
relating to penal offenses.
(b) This subsection applies to the definitions of "Hoosier veteran"
and "veteran" when used in reference to state programs for veterans.
The term "veteran" includes "Hoosier veteran", and applies to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is expressly
excluded by the terms of the statute, is plainly repugnant to the intent
of the general assembly or of the context of the statute, or is
inconsistent with federal law. "Hoosier veteran" means an individual
who meets the following criteria:
(1) The individual is a resident of Indiana.
(2) The individual served in an active or reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States or the Indiana National Guard.
(3) The individual completed any required military occupational
specialty training and was not discharged or separated from the
armed forces or the Indiana National Guard under conditions
other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


The definitions set forth in this subsection may not be construed to
affect a Hoosier veteran's eligibility for any state program that is based
upon a particular aspect of the Hoosier veteran's service such as a
disability or a wartime service requirement.
SECTION 2. IC 4-1-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 15. Physical Privacy of Hoosiers
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a public
building that may be used by more than one (1) individual at a time
and in which individuals may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "public building" means a
structure or part of a structure owned or leased by:
(1) the state government;
(2) a county government;
(3) the government of a city, town, or township;
(4) a political subdivision; or
(5) an instrumentality of the state;
that is generally open to members of the public with or without the
payment of an admission fee or membership dues.
(b) The term does not include a:
(1) correctional facility (as defined in IC 11-8-11-1);
(2) county jail;
(3) school (as defined in IC 20-33-14-2); or
(4) state educational institution.
Sec. 3. A governmental entity subject to this chapter shall
designate each multiple occupancy restroom or changing area in
a public building as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex (as defined in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany an individual needing assistance if the
individual assisting the individual needing assistance is:
(i) an employee or other staff of the governmental entity
for the public building; or
(ii) the individual's parent or caregiver.
Sec. 5. (a) A governmental entity subject to this chapter shall
take reasonable steps to prohibit an individual from using a
multiple occupancy restroom or changing area designated for the
opposite sex in violation of section 4 of this chapter.
(b) A governmental entity that fails to take reasonable steps
under subsection (a) violates this chapter.
(c) A governmental entity's compliance with section 3 of this
chapter does not, by itself, satisfy the duty imposed under
subsection (a).
Sec. 6. An individual who violates section 4 of this chapter and
refuses to leave the multiple occupancy restroom or changing area
when asked to do so by:
(1) an employee of the governmental entity that leases or owns
the public building; or
(2) a law enforcement officer;
commits criminal trespass under IC 35-43-2-2(b)(13).
Sec. 7. Beginning July 1, 2027, in addition to any civil action
filed by a taxpayer under section 8 of this chapter, the attorney
general may file an action for mandate to compel compliance with
this chapter.
Sec. 8. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, any taxpayer of a
governmental entity subject to this chapter that fails to comply
with this chapter may file a civil action against the governmental
entity for each violation of this chapter.
(b) The court may award to a taxpayer who prevails in an action
under this section any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) actual and consequential damages resulting from the
violation; or
(B) liquidated damages of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000).
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
Sec. 9. It is not a defense to a civil action brought in state court
under this chapter that a federal district court or the United States
Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit has:
(1) declared any provision or application of this chapter
unconstitutional; or
(2) enjoined or restrained any state official from bringing
prosecutions under this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person,
including an attorney or a law firm that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief to prevent a governmental entity or person from
enforcing or bringing an action to enforce this chapter, is jointly
and severally liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
of the prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable
attorney's fees the prevailing party incurs in its efforts to recover
costs and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a litigant that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief under subsection (a), regardless of the reason
for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
under subsection (a) voluntarily dismisses a claim or cause of
action.
(c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an attorney or a law
firm that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described in
subsection (a), not later than two (2) years after the judgment
becomes final.
(d) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (c)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
(e) If a civil action is brought under subsection (c), the action
may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (c).
Sec. 11. A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in this chapter; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of this chapter;
in accordance with IC 34-13-3-3.
Sec. 12. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a litigant
from asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision
of application of this chapter as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
Sec. 13. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 3. IC 9-24-11-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), a
learner's permit or driver's license issued under this article must contain
the following information:
(1) The full legal name of the permittee or licensee.
(2) The date of birth of the permittee or licensee.
(3) The address of the principal residence of the permittee or
licensee.
(4) The hair color and eye color of the permittee or licensee.
(5) The date of issue and expiration date of the permit or license.
(6) The gender (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)) of the permittee
or licensee.
(7) The unique identifying number of the permit or license.
(8) The weight of the permittee or licensee.
(9) The height of the permittee or licensee.
(10) A reproduction of the signature of the permittee or licensee.
(11) If the permittee or licensee is less than eighteen (18) years of
age at the time of issuance, the dates, notated prominently, on
which the permittee or licensee will become:
(A) eighteen (18) years of age; and
(B) twenty-one (21) years of age.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(12) If the permittee or licensee is at least eighteen (18) years of
age but less than twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of
issuance, the date, notated prominently, on which the permittee or
licensee will become twenty-one (21) years of age.
(13) Except as provided in subsection (b), a digital photograph of
the permittee or licensee.
(b) The bureau may provide for the omission of a photograph or
computerized image from any driver's license or learner's permit issued
in the form of a physical credential if there is good cause for the
omission. However, a driver's license or learner's permit issued without
a digital photograph may not be issued in the form of a mobile
credential and must include a statement that indicates that the driver's
license or learner's permit issued without a digital photograph may not
be accepted by a federal agency for federal identification or any other
federal purpose.
(c) A driver's license or learner's permit issued to an individual who
has temporary lawful status as indicated by:
(1) a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or has nonimmigrant
visa status for entry in the United States;
(2) a pending application for asylum in the United States;
(3) a pending or approved application for temporary protected
status in the United States;
(4) having an approved deferred action status; or
(5) a pending application for adjustment of status to that of an
alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United
States or conditional permanent residence status in the United
States;
must be clearly identified as a temporary driver's license or learner's
permit. A temporary driver's license or learner's permit issued under
this subsection may not be renewed without the presentation of valid
documentary evidence proving that the licensee's or permittee's
temporary status has been extended.
(d) For purposes of subsection (a), an individual certified as a
program participant in the address confidentiality program under
IC 5-26.5 is not required to provide the address of the individual's
principal residence, but may provide an address designated by the
office of the attorney general under IC 5-26.5 as the address of the
individual's principal residence.
SECTION 4. IC 9-24-13-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) If:
(1) an individual holding a driver's license or permit issued in the
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


form of a physical credential under this article changes the
address shown on the driver's license or permit application; or
(2) the name of a licensee or permittee is changed by marriage or
otherwise;
the licensee or permittee shall make application for an amended
driver's license or permit issued in the form of a physical credential
under IC 9-24-9 containing the correct information within thirty (30)
days of the change. For fee purposes, the application shall be treated as
a replacement license under IC 9-24-14-1.
(b) The gender designation on the driver's license or permit may
not be amended except due to clerical error.
SECTION 5. IC 11-8-8-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Except as provided in section 22 of this
chapter, as used in this chapter, "sex offender" means a person
convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (including performing sexual
conduct in the presence of a minor) (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a Class A,
Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014), unless:
(A) the person is convicted of sexual misconduct with a minor
as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(B) the person is not more than:
(i) four (4) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed after June 30, 2007; or
(ii) five (5) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed before July 1, 2007; and
(C) the sentencing court finds that the person should not be
required to register as a sex offender.
(9) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(10) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(11) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than eighteen
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(18) years of age, and the person who kidnapped the victim is not
the victim's parent or guardian.
(12) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, and the person who confined or
removed the victim is not the victim's parent or guardian.
(13) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(14) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 4 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(15) Promotion of human sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.1.
(16) Promotion of child sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(a).
(17) Promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child (IC
35-42-3.5-1.2(c)).
(18) Child sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1.3).
(19) Human trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 if the victim is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(20) Sexual misconduct by a service provider with a detained or
supervised child (IC 35-44.1-3-10(c)).
(21) Criminal trespass in a public building's multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area (IC 35-43-2-2(i)).
(b) The term includes:
(1) a person who is required to register as a sex offender in any
jurisdiction; and
(2) a child who has committed a delinquent act, or a person
prosecuted under IC 31-30-1-4(d) for an offense described in
subsection (a) committed when the person was less than eighteen
(18) years of age, but who was at least twenty-one (21) years of
age when the charge was filed, and who:
(A) is at least fourteen (14) years of age;
(B) is on probation, is on parole, is discharged from a facility
by the department of correction, is discharged from a secure
private facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-115), or is discharged
from a juvenile detention facility as a result of an adjudication
as a delinquent child for an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult; and
(C) is found by a court by clear and convincing evidence to be
likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(c) In making a determination under subsection (b)(2)(C), the court
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


shall consider expert testimony concerning whether a child is likely to
repeat an act that would be an offense described in subsection (a) if
committed by an adult.
(d) A person ordered to register under subsection (b)(2) may
petition the court to reconsider the order at any time after completing
court ordered sex offender treatment. The court shall consider expert
testimony concerning whether a child or person is likely to repeat an
offense described in subsection (a) or an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
SECTION 6. IC 11-8-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Physical Privacy in Correctional Facilities
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "correctional facility" means a
penal institution under the control of the department.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, a committed person may
not be housed in a correctional facility that does not align with the
committed person's sex (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
Sec. 3.(a) Beginning July 1, 2027, in addition to any civil action
filed by a taxpayer under section 4 of this chapter, the attorney
general may file a civil action to petition a court with jurisdiction
to impose a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
against a superintendent of a correctional facility for each violation
of this chapter committed by a correctional facility, for which the
superintendent shall be personally liable. The attorney general
shall transfer all civil penalties collected under this chapter to the
treasurer of state for deposit in the state general fund.
(c) The attorney general may file an action for mandate to
compel compliance with this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, an Indiana taxpayer may file
a civil action against a correctional facility for each violation of this
chapter.
(b) The court may award to a taxpayer who prevails in an action
under this section any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) actual and consequential damages resulting from the
violation; or
(B) liquidated damages of not more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


Sec. 5. It is not a defense to a civil action brought in state court
under this chapter that a federal district court or the United States
Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit has:
(1) declared any provision or application of this chapter
unconstitutional; or
(2) enjoined or restrained any state official from bringing
prosecutions under this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, including
an attorney or a law firm that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
to prevent a governmental entity or person from enforcing or
bringing an action to enforce this chapter, is jointly and severally
liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney's fees of the
prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
the prevailing party incurs in its efforts to recover costs and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a litigant that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief under subsection (a), regardless of the reason
for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
under subsection (a) voluntarily dismisses a claim or cause of
action.
(c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an attorney or a law
firm that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described in
subsection (a), not later than two (2) years after the judgment
becomes final.
(d) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (c)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(e) If a civil action is brought under subsection (c), the action
may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (c).
Sec. 7. A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in this chapter; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of this chapter;
in accordance with IC 34-13-3-3.
Sec. 8. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a litigant
from asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision
of application of this chapter as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
Sec. 9. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 7. IC 16-37-1-7.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.2. (a) The state department shall establish
the following two (2) forms for certificates of birth:
(1) A short form birth certificate.
(2) A long form birth certificate.
(b) A short form birth certificate must meet the following
requirements:
(1) Created on 8.5 by 5.5 inch paper.
(2) Include the following information concerning the child:
(A) Name.
(B) Sex (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(C) Date of birth.
(D) Place of birth.
(E) Name of birth parents, if known.
(F) Birthplace of parents.
(3) Include the following additional information:
(A) The filing date of the certificate.
(B) The name of the local health officer of state registrar.
(C) The issuing date of the certificate.
(D) The name of the county health department that issued
the birth certificate.
(E) The state seal.
(c) A short form birth certificate may only be amended or
altered due to the following:
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(1) A clerical error.
(2) A DNA test that either:
(A) proves paternity or sets aside a paternity affidavit, as
described in IC 16-37-2-2.1; or
(B) identifies the misidentified sex of the child as described
in IC 16-37-2-10.
(3) The establishment of paternity outside of a DNA test, in
accordance with IC 16-37-2-2.1.
(4) An order issued by a court requiring the state department
to change paternity on a birth certificate.
(5) Identification of a child, as set forth in IC 16-37-2-12.
(6) The marriage of the parents, as set forth in IC 16-37-2-16.
(7) An adoption, as set forth in IC 31-19-13.
The state department must document any change made under this
subsection on the short form birth certificate by clearly designating
on the form that an amendment has been made.
(d) A long form birth certificate must meet the following
requirements:
(1) Created on 8.5 by 11 inch paper.
(2) Include the following information concerning the child:
(A) Name.
(B) Sex (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(C) Date of birth.
(D) Time of birth.
(E) Place or facility of birth.
(F) Full legal name of parents at the time of birth.
(G) Parent's name before first marriage.
(H) Parent's date of birth.
(I) Parent's residence state and address.
(J) Parent's birthplace.
(3) Include the following additional information:
(A) Birth attendant's name.
(B) Date the birth was certified.
(C) Name of the individual certifying the certificate.
(D) Attendant's name, title, and address.
(E) Date filed by the health officer.
(F) The issuing authority.
(G) A warning that the document may not be reproduced.
(e) A long form birth certificate may not be amended or altered.
If an amendment or alteration to the short form birth certificate is
made under subsection (c), the long form birth certificate is no
longer valid and converts to a historical document. A long form
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


birth certificate may only be used internally by the state
department.
SECTION 8. IC 16-37-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.33-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in section 7.5 of this
chapter and subsection (d), a local health officer shall provide a
certification of birth, death, or stillbirth registration upon request by
any person only if:
(1) the health officer is satisfied that the applicant has a direct
interest in the matter;
(2) the health officer determines that the certificate is necessary
for the determination of personal or property rights or for
compliance with state or federal law; and
(3) the applicant for a birth certificate presents at least one (1)
form of identification.
However, the local health officer must issue a short form birth
certificate of an applicant's own birth registration.
(b) A local health officer's decision whether or not to issue a
certified copy of a short form birth certificate is subject to review by
a court.
(c) A local health officer may issue a certification of birth, death, or
stillbirth from the electronic registration systems in section 3.1 of this
chapter, regardless of the location of the filing of the record.
(d) A local health officer may not issue a copy of a short form birth
certificate of a missing child to which a notice has been attached under
IC 10-13-5-11 without the authorization of the Indiana clearinghouse
for information on missing children, missing veterans at risk, and
missing endangered adults.
(e) Upon determination that a person may be provided a certification
of death under subsection (a), the local health officer shall provide to
the person a certification of death that excludes information concerning
the cause of death if the person requests the exclusion of this
information.
SECTION 9. IC 16-37-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.138-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. (a) The local health officer shall make a
permanent record of the following from a birth certificate:
(1) Name.
(2) Sex (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(3) Date of birth.
(4) Place of birth.
(5) Name of the parents.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(6) Birthplace of the parents.
(7) The date of filing of the certificate of birth.
(8) The person in attendance at the birth.
(9) Location of the birth, including whether the birth occurred at
a hospital, licensed health care facility, home, or other non-health
care facility.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the permanent record shall
be open to public inspection. Upon request by an individual, a paper
copy of the permanent record in subsection (a) must be provided by the
local health officer.
(c) The birth record of an adopted child remains subject to the
confidentiality provisions of IC 31-19 regarding the release of adoption
information.
(d) The permanent record of the information required under this
section may be maintained in the Indiana birth registration system
(IBRS).
SECTION 10. IC 16-37-2-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. (a) As used in
this section, "DNA test" means an identification process in which the
unique genetic code of an individual that is carried by the individual's
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is compared with the genetic codes of
another individual.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e), the state
department may make additions to or corrections in a certificate of
birth on receipt of adequate documentary evidence including the results
of a DNA test under subsection (c) or a paternity affidavit executed
under section 2.1 of this chapter. demonstrating an error in the
information listed in the certificate of birth.
(c) The state department may make an addition to a birth certificate
solely for the purposes of paternity based on the results of a DNA
test only if:
(1) a father is not named on the birth certificate; and
(2) a citation to this subsection as the authority for the addition is
noted on the birth certificate.
(d) The state department may only make corrections to a birth
certificate based on the results of a DNA test that are consistent
with the definition of "sex" set forth in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22).
(e) For purposes of paternity, the state department may make
an addition to or correction in a birth certificate based on a
paternity affidavit executed under section 2.1 of this chapter or
based on the results of a DNA test. The state department may only
make the addition if:
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(1) a father is not named on the birth certificate or a paternity
affidavit is set aside as set forth in section 2.1 of this chapter;
and
(2) the state department makes a notation on the birth
certificate that references this subsection for the authority of
the addition.
SECTION 11. IC 20-33-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 14. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a school
building that may be used by more than one (1) student at a time
and in which students may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "school" means any:
(1) school maintained by a school corporation;
(2) charter school; or
(3) state accredited school;
that provides instruction to students in any combination of
kindergarten through grade 12.
Sec. 3. Each school shall designate each multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex (as defined in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is:
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(i) an employee or other staff of the school; or
(ii) the student's parent or caregiver.
Sec. 5. (a) A school shall take reasonable steps to prohibit an
individual from using a multiple occupancy restroom or changing
area designated for the opposite sex in violation of section 4 of this
chapter.
(b) A school that fails to take reasonable steps under subsection
(a) violates this chapter.
(c) A school's compliance with sections 3 and 6 of this chapter
does not, by itself, satisfy the duty imposed under subsection (a).
Sec. 6. (a) A parent of an unemancipated minor student or a
student who is an adult or emancipated minor may submit a
grievance to a school corporation or school for a violation of
section 3, 4, or 5 of this chapter.
(b) Each school corporation or school shall:
(1) establish and maintain a grievance procedure; or
(2) maintain a grievance or protest procedure that the school
corporation or school established before July 1, 2026;
for the resolution of a grievance submitted under this section.
Sec. 7. (a) Notwithstanding IC 34-13-3-3(a), beginning July 1,
2027, if a school corporation or school violates this chapter, a
student who is directly or indirectly injured as a result of the
violation may bring a civil action against the school corporation or
school.
(b) A school corporation or school may not retaliate or
otherwise take any adverse action against a student for reporting
a violation or bringing a civil action for a violation of this chapter.
Sec. 8. The court shall award to a student who prevails in an
action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) actual and consequential damages resulting from the
violation; or
(B) liquidated damages of not more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
Sec. 9. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, the department shall bring an
administrative action against the superintendent of a school
corporation or the equivalent authority of a charter school or state
accredited school that violates this chapter.
(b) The attorney general's authority under section 10 of this
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


chapter is independent of any administrative action under this
section.
Sec. 10. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, in addition to any civil action
filed by a student under section 7 of this chapter, the attorney
general may file a civil action to petition a court with jurisdiction
to impose a civil penalty against the superintendent or the
equivalent authority for a charter school or state accredited school
of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of this
chapter committed by a school under their control, for which the
superintendent or the equivalent authority for a charter school or
state accredited school shall be personally liable. The attorney
general shall transfer all civil penalties collected under this chapter
to the treasurer of state for deposit in the state general fund.
(b) The attorney general may file an action for injunctive or
declaratory relief to compel compliance with this chapter.
Sec. 11. It is not a defense to a civil action brought in state court
under this chapter that a federal district court or the United States
Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit has:
(1) declared any provision or application of this chapter
unconstitutional; or
(2) enjoined or restrained any state official from bringing
prosecutions under this chapter.
Sec. 12. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a school corporation
or school from providing a single occupancy restroom, locker
room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 13. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person,
including an attorney or a law firm that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief to prevent a governmental entity or person from
enforcing or bringing an action to enforce this chapter, is jointly
and severally liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
of the prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable
attorney's fees the prevailing party incurs in its efforts to recover
costs and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a litigant that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief under subsection (a), regardless of the reason
for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
under subsection (a) voluntarily dismisses a claim or cause of
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


action.
(c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an attorney or a law
firm that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described in
subsection (a), not later than two (2) years after the judgment
becomes final.
(d) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (c)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
(e) If a civil action is brought under subsection (c), the action
may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (c).
Sec. 14. A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in this chapter; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of this chapter;
in accordance with IC 34-13-3-3.
Sec. 15. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a litigant
from asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision
of application of this chapter as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
Sec. 16. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 12. IC 20-33-14.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 14.5. Gender Identification
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "school" means any of the
following:
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(1) A public school, including a charter school.
(2) A state accredited school.
(3) A nonaccredited nonpublic school that has at least one (1)
employee.
(4) A laboratory school established under IC 20-24.5-2.
(5) The Indiana School for the Blind and Visually Impaired
established by IC 20-21-2-1.
(6) The Indiana School for the Deaf established by
IC 20-22-2-1.
Sec. 2. Except as provided in section 3 of this chapter, a school
may not promote the use of, encourage the use of, or require,
compel, or coerce a student, an employee of the school, or a staff
member of the school to use:
(1) a pronoun, title, or other word to identify a student, school
employee, or other individual that is inconsistent with the
student's, employee's, or individual's sex (as defined in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22); or
(2) a name or nickname to identify a student that is
inconsistent with the student's name on the student's birth
certificate.
Sec. 3.An employee or a staff member of a school may only use
a pronoun, title, name, nickname, or other word described in
section 2 of this chapter to identify a student if the student, who is
an adult or an emancipated minor, or a parent of the student, who
is an unemancipated minor:
(1) requests in writing the use of a specific pronoun, title,
name, nickname, or other word to identify the student; and
(2) provides documentation from a health care provider
verifying that the student has a sincere, persistent, and
consistent belief that requires use of the specific pronoun,
title, name, nickname or other word to identify the student.
Sec. 4. Any instruction a school provides concerning sex and
gender may not conflict with the definition of sex and gender
described in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22).
Sec. 5. A licensing authority in Indiana may not require:
(1) an employee; or
(2) a staff member;
of a school who holds a license issued by the licensing authority to
violate any provision of this chapter as a condition of receiving or
renewing the employee's or staff member's license.
SECTION 13. IC 21-39-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a state
educational institution building that may be used by more than one
(1) student at a time and in which students may be in various stages
of undress in the presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. Each state educational institution shall designate each
multiple occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex (as defined in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex;
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is:
(i) an employee or other staff of the state educational
institution; or
(ii) the student's parent or caregiver; or
(3) individual or student is entering a multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area to assist the individual's or
student's child.
Sec. 4. (a) A state educational institution shall take reasonable
steps to prohibit an individual from using a multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area designated for the opposite sex in
violation of section 3 of this chapter.
(b) A state educational institution that fails to take reasonable
steps under subsection (a) violates this chapter.
(c) A state educational institution's compliance with sections 2
and 5 of this chapter does not, by itself, satisfy the duty imposed
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


under subsection (a).
Sec. 5. (a) A student may submit a grievance to a state
educational institution for a violation of section 2, 3, or 4 of this
chapter.
(b) Each state educational institution shall:
(1) establish and maintain a grievance procedure; or
(2) maintain a grievance or protest procedure that the state
educational institution established before July 1, 2026;
for the resolution of a grievance submitted under this section.
Sec. 6. (a) Notwithstanding IC 34-13-3-3(a), beginning July 1,
2027, if a state educational institution violates this chapter, a
student who is directly or indirectly injured as a result of the
violation may bring a civil action against the state educational
institution.
(b) A state educational institution may not retaliate or otherwise
take any adverse action against a student for reporting a violation
or bringing a civil action for a violation of this chapter.
Sec. 7. The court shall award to a student who prevails in an
action under section 6 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) actual and consequential damages resulting from the
violation; or
(B) liquidated damages of not more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
Sec. 8. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, the commission shall bring an
administrative action against the president of a state educational
institution that violates this chapter.
(b) The attorney general's authority under section 9 of this
chapter is independent of any administrative action under this
section.
Sec. 9. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, in addition to any civil action
filed by a student under section 6 of this chapter, the attorney
general may file a civil action to petition a court with jurisdiction
to impose a civil penalty against a president of a state educational
institution of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each
violation of this chapter committed by a state educational
institution under the president of the state educational institution's
control, for which the president of the state educational institution
shall be personally liable. The attorney general shall transfer all
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


civil penalties collected under this chapter to the treasurer of state
for deposit in the state general fund.
(b) The attorney general may file an action to compel a state
educational institution to comply with this chapter.
Sec. 10. It is not a defense to a civil action brought in state court
under this chapter that a federal district court or the United States
Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit has:
(1) declared any provision or application of this chapter
unconstitutional; or
(2) enjoined or restrained any state official from bringing
prosecutions under this chapter.
Sec. 11. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state educational
institution from providing a single occupancy restroom, locker
room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 12. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person,
including an attorney or a law firm that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief to prevent a governmental entity or person from
enforcing or bringing an action to enforce this chapter, is jointly
and severally liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
of the prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable
attorney's fees the prevailing party incurs in its efforts to recover
costs and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a litigant that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief under subsection (a), regardless of the reason
for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
under subsection (a) voluntarily dismisses a claim or cause of
action.
(c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an attorney or a law
firm that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described in
subsection (a), not later than two (2) years after the judgment
becomes final.
(d) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (c)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
(e) If a civil action is brought under subsection (c), the action
may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (c).
Sec. 13. A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in this chapter; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of this chapter;
in accordance with IC 34-13-3-3.
Sec. 14. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a litigant
from asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision
of application of this chapter as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
Sec. 15. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 14. IC 24-4-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 27. Physical Privacy in Businesses
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "business" means an entity that:
(1) registers with the secretary of state to do business in
Indiana in accordance with the procedures described in
IC 23; and
(2) has a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area on
the entity's premises in Indiana.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area" means a room or area in a business that may be
used by more than one (1) individual at a time and in which
individuals may be in various stages of undress in the presence of
other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 3. Each business shall designate each multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex (as defined in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(b) An individual may use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that does not align with the individuals's sex if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany an individual needing assistance if the
individual assisting the individual needing assistance is:
(i) an employee or other staff of the business; or
(ii) the individual's parent or caregiver.
Sec. 5. (a) A business shall take reasonable steps to prohibit an
individual from using a multiple occupancy restroom or changing
area designated for the opposite sex in violation of section 4 of this
chapter.
(b) A business that fails to take reasonable steps under
subsection (a) violates this chapter.
(c) A business's compliance with section 3 of this chapter does
not, by itself, satisfy the duty imposed under subsection (a).
Sec. 6. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, an individual who is directly
or indirectly injured as a result of a violation of section 3 or 5 of
this chapter may bring a civil action against the business.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, an individual who is directly or
indirectly injured as a result of a violation of section 4 of this
chapter may bring a civil action against an individual who violated
section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 7. The court shall award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 6 of this chapter:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) actual and consequential damages resulting from the
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


violation; or
(B) liquidated damages of not more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
Sec. 8. It is not a defense to a civil action brought in state court
under this chapter that a federal district court or the United States
Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit has:
(1) declared any provision or application of this chapter
unconstitutional; or
(2) enjoined or restrained any state official from bringing
prosecutions under this chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, including
an attorney or a law firm that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
to prevent a person from enforcing or bringing an action to enforce
this chapter, is jointly and severally liable to pay the costs and
reasonable attorney's fees of the prevailing party, including the
costs and reasonable attorney's fees the prevailing party incurs in
its efforts to recover costs and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a litigant that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief under subsection (a), regardless of the reason
for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
under subsection (a) voluntarily dismisses a claim or cause of
action.
(c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an attorney or a law
firm that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described by
subsection (a), not later than two (2) years after the judgment
becomes final.
(d) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (c)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
(e) If a civil action is brought under subsection (c), the action
may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (c).
Sec. 10. A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in this chapter; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of this chapter;
in accordance with IC 34-13-3-3.
Sec. 11. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a litigant
from asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision
of application of this chapter as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
Sec. 12. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 15. IC 34-12-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 6. Legal Actions Concerning Physical Privacy
Sec. 1. A court of this state does not have jurisdiction to
consider, and may not award relief, under any action that:
(1) seeks declaratory or injunctive relief, or any type of writ,
including a writ of prohibition, that would challenge the
validity of any provision in:
(A) IC 4-1-15;
(B) IC 11-8-11;
(C) IC 20-33-14;
(D) IC 21-39-10;
(E) IC 24-4-27; or
(F) IC 36-2-13-20; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of the statutes listed in
subdivision (1).
Sec. 2. A plaintiff class may not litigate, and a court may not
certify, any action that:
(1) seeks declaratory or injunctive relief, or any type of writ,
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


including a writ of prohibition, that would challenge the
validity of any provision in:
(A) IC 4-1-15;
(B) IC 11-8-11;
(C) IC 20-33-14;
(D) IC 21-39-10;
(E) IC 24-4-27; or
(F) IC 36-2-13-20; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of the statutes listed in
subdivision (1).
SECTION 16. IC 34-13-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A governmental entity or an
employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment is not
liable if a loss results from the following:
(1) The natural condition of unimproved property.
(2) The condition of a reservoir, dam, canal, conduit, drain, or
similar structure when used by a person for a purpose that is not
foreseeable.
(3) The temporary condition of a public thoroughfare or extreme
sport area that results from weather.
(4) The condition of an unpaved road, trail, or footpath, the
purpose of which is to provide access to a recreation or scenic
area.
(5) The design, construction, control, operation, or normal
condition of an extreme sport area, if all entrances to the extreme
sport area are marked with:
(A) a set of rules governing the use of the extreme sport area;
(B) a warning concerning the hazards and dangers associated
with the use of the extreme sport area; and
(C) a statement that the extreme sport area may be used only
by persons operating extreme sport equipment.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain extreme
sports areas in a reasonably safe condition.
(6) The initiation of a judicial or an administrative proceeding.
(7) The performance of a discretionary function; however, the
provision of medical or optical care as provided in IC 34-6-2.1-54
shall be considered as a ministerial act.
(8) The adoption and enforcement of or failure to adopt or
enforce:
(A) a law (including rules and regulations); or
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(B) in the case of a public school or charter school, a policy;
unless the act of enforcement constitutes false arrest or false
imprisonment.
(9) An act or omission performed in good faith and without
malice under the apparent authority of a statute which is invalid
if the employee would not have been liable had the statute been
valid.
(10) The act or omission of anyone other than the governmental
entity or the governmental entity's employee.
(11) The issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of, or failure
or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any permit, license,
certificate, approval, order, or similar authorization, where the
authority is discretionary under the law.
(12) Failure to make an inspection, or making an inadequate or
negligent inspection, of any property, other than the property of
a governmental entity, to determine whether the property
complied with or violates any law or contains a hazard to health
or safety.
(13) Entry upon any property where the entry is expressly or
impliedly authorized by law.
(14) Misrepresentation if unintentional.
(15) Theft by another person of money in the employee's official
custody, unless the loss was sustained because of the employee's
own negligent or wrongful act or omission.
(16) Injury to the property of a person under the jurisdiction and
control of the department of correction if the person has not
exhausted the administrative remedies and procedures provided
by section 7 of this chapter.
(17) Injury to the person or property of a person under supervision
of a governmental entity and who is:
(A) on probation;
(B) assigned to an alcohol and drug services program under
IC 12-23, a minimum security release program under
IC 11-10-8, a pretrial conditional release program under
IC 35-33-8, or a community corrections program under
IC 11-12; or
(C) subject to a court order requiring the person to be escorted
by a county police officer while on or in a government
building (as defined in IC 36-9-13-3) owned by a county
building authority under IC 36-9-13, unless the injury is the
result of an act or omission amounting to:
(i) gross negligence;
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(ii) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(iii) intentional misconduct.
(18) Design of a highway (as defined in IC 9-13-2-73), toll road
project (as defined in IC 8-15-2-4(4)), tollway (as defined in
IC 8-15-3-7), or project (as defined in IC 8-15.7-2-14) if the
claimed loss occurs at least twenty (20) years after the public
highway, toll road project, tollway, or project was designed or
substantially redesigned; except that this subdivision shall not be
construed to relieve a responsible governmental entity from the
continuing duty to provide and maintain public highways in a
reasonably safe condition.
(19) Development, adoption, implementation, operation,
maintenance, or use of an enhanced emergency communication
system.
(20) Injury to a student or a student's property by an employee of
a school corporation if the employee is acting reasonably under a:
(A) discipline policy adopted under IC 20-33-8-12; or
(B) restraint and seclusion plan adopted under IC 20-20-40-14.
(21) An act or omission performed in good faith under the
apparent authority of a court order described in IC 35-46-1-15.1
or IC 35-46-1-15.3 that is invalid, including an arrest or
imprisonment related to the enforcement of the court order, if the
governmental entity or employee would not have been liable had
the court order been valid.
(22) An act taken to investigate or remediate hazardous
substances, petroleum, or other pollutants associated with a
brownfield (as defined in IC 13-11-2-19.3) unless:
(A) the loss is a result of reckless conduct; or
(B) the governmental entity was responsible for the initial
placement of the hazardous substances, petroleum, or other
pollutants on the brownfield.
(23) The operation of an off-road vehicle (as defined in
IC 14-8-2-185) by a nongovernmental employee, or by a
governmental employee not acting within the scope of the
employment of the employee, on a public highway in a county
road system outside the corporate limits of a city or town, unless
the loss is the result of an act or omission amounting to:
(A) gross negligence;
(B) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(C) intentional misconduct.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain highways
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


in a reasonably safe condition for the operation of motor vehicles
licensed by the bureau of motor vehicles for operation on public
highways.
(24) Any act or omission rendered in connection with a request,
investigation, assessment, or opinion provided under
IC 36-9-28.7.
(b) This subsection applies to a cause of action that accrues during
a period of a state disaster emergency declared under IC 10-14-3-12 to
respond to COVID-19, if the state of disaster emergency was declared
after February 29, 2020, and before April 1, 2022. A governmental
entity or an employee acting within the scope of the employee's
employment is not liable for an act or omission arising from COVID-19
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, willful or
wanton misconduct, or intentional misrepresentation. If a claim
described in this subsection is:
(1) a claim for injury or death resulting from medical malpractice;
and
(2) not barred by the immunity provided under this subsection;
the claimant is required to comply with all of the provisions of
IC 34-18 (medical malpractice act).
(c) A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in:
(A) IC 4-1-15;
(B) IC 11-8-11;
(C) IC 20-33-14;
(D) IC 21-39-10;
(E) IC 24-4-27; or
(F) IC 36-2-13-20; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of a provision listed in
subdivision (1).
SECTION 17. IC 35-43-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 239, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section,
"authorized person" means a person authorized by an agricultural
operation or a scientific research facility to act on behalf of the
agricultural operation or the scientific research facility.
(b) A person who:
(1) not having a contractual interest in the property, knowingly or
intentionally enters the real property of another person after
having been denied entry by the other person, that person's agent,
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


or a law enforcement officer acting on behalf of the other person
or that person's agent;
(2) not having a contractual interest in the property, knowingly or
intentionally refuses to leave the real property of another person
after having been asked to leave by the other person, that person's
agent, or a law enforcement officer acting on behalf of the other
person or that person's agent;
(3) accompanies another person in a vehicle, with knowledge that
the other person knowingly or intentionally is exerting
unauthorized control over the vehicle;
(4) knowingly or intentionally interferes with the possession or
use of the property of another person without the person's consent;
(5) not having a contractual interest in the property, knowingly or
intentionally enters the:
(A) property of an agricultural operation that is used for the
production, processing, propagation, packaging, cultivation,
harvesting, care, management, or storage of an animal, plant,
or other agricultural product, including any pasturage or land
used for timber management, without the consent of the owner
of the agricultural operation or an authorized person; or
(B) dwelling of another person without the person's consent;
(6) knowingly or intentionally:
(A) travels by train without lawful authority or the railroad
carrier's consent; and
(B) rides on the outside of a train or inside a passenger car,
locomotive, or freight car, including a boxcar, flatbed, or
container without lawful authority or the railroad carrier's
consent;
(7) not having a contractual interest in the property, knowingly or
intentionally enters or refuses to leave the property of another
person after having been prohibited from entering or asked to
leave the property by a law enforcement officer when the property
is:
(A) vacant real property (as defined in IC 36-7-36-5) or a
vacant structure (as defined in IC 36-7-36-6); or
(B) designated by a municipality or county enforcement
authority to be:
(i) abandoned property or an abandoned structure (as
defined in IC 36-7-36-1); or
(ii) an unsafe building or an unsafe premises (as described
in IC 36-7-9);
(8) not having a contractual interest in the property, knowingly or
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


intentionally enters the real property of an agricultural operation
(as defined in IC 32-30-6-1) without the permission of the owner
of the agricultural operation or an authorized person, and
knowingly or intentionally engages in conduct that causes
property damage to:
(A) the owner of or a person having a contractual interest in
the agricultural operation;
(B) the operator of the agricultural operation; or
(C) a person having personal property located on the property
of the agricultural operation;
(9) not having a contractual interest in the property, knowingly or
intentionally enters the real property of a scientific research
facility (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-287) without the permission
of, or with permission which was fraudulently obtained from, the
owner of the scientific research facility or an authorized person,
and knowingly or intentionally engages in conduct that causes
property damage to:
(A) the owner of or a person having a contractual interest in
the scientific research facility;
(B) the operator of the scientific research facility; or
(C) a person having personal property located on the property
of the scientific research facility;
(10) knowingly or intentionally enters the property of another
person after being denied entry by a court order that has been
issued to the person or issued to the general public by
conspicuous posting on or around the premises in areas where a
person can observe the order when the property has been
designated by a municipality or county enforcement authority to
be:
(A) a vacant property;
(B) an abandoned property;
(C) an abandoned structure (as defined in IC 36-7-36-1); or
(D) an unsafe building or an unsafe premises (as described in
IC 36-7-9);
(11) knowingly or intentionally enters or refuses to leave the polls
(as defined in IC 3-5-2.1-80) or chute (as defined in
IC 3-5-2.1-21) after having been prohibited from entering or
asked to leave the polls or chute by a precinct election officer (as
defined in IC 3-5-2.1-82) or a law enforcement officer acting on
behalf of a precinct election officer; or
(12) knowingly or intentionally:
(A) without permission or prior authorization, enters an area
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


of property that is locked; or
(B) refuses to leave an area of a property that is otherwise not
accessible to the public, after being asked to leave the area of
a property by a law enforcement officer or an employee or
agent of the owner or operator of the property; or
(13) except as provided in IC 4-1-15-4(b), knowingly or
intentionally:
(A) enters a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area
in a public building (as defined in IC 4-1-15-1) designated
for a sex (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)) that is not the
individual's sex; and
(B) refuses to leave the multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area after being asked to leave by:
(i) an employee of the governmental entity that leases or
owns the public building; or
(ii) a law enforcement officer;
commits criminal trespass, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the
offense is a Level 6 felony if it is committed on a scientific research
facility, on a facility belonging to a public utility (as defined in
IC 32-24-1-5.9(a)), on school property, or on a school bus or the person
has a prior unrelated conviction for an offense under this section
concerning the same property. The offense is a Level 6 felony, for
purposes of subdivision (8), if the property damage is more than seven
hundred fifty dollars ($750) and less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000). The offense is a Level 5 felony, for purposes of subdivisions
(8) and (9), if the property damage is at least fifty thousand dollars
($50,000).
(c) A person has been denied entry under subsection (b)(1) when the
person has been denied entry by means of:
(1) personal communication, oral or written;
(2) posting or exhibiting a notice at the main entrance in a manner
that is either prescribed by law or likely to come to the attention
of the public;
(3) a hearing authority or court order under IC 32-30-6,
IC 32-30-7, IC 32-30-8, IC 36-7-9, or IC 36-7-36; or
(4) posting the property by placing identifying purple marks on
trees or posts around the area where entry is denied.
(d) For the purposes of subsection (c)(4):
(1) each purple mark must be readily visible to any person
approaching the property and must be placed:
(A) on a tree:
(i) as a vertical line of at least eight (8) inches in length and
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


with the bottom of the mark at least three (3) feet and not
more than five (5) feet from the ground; and
(ii) not more than one hundred (100) feet from the nearest
other marked tree; or
(B) on a post:
(i) with the mark covering at least the top two (2) inches of
the post, and with the bottom of the mark at least three (3)
feet and not more than five (5) feet six (6) inches from the
ground; and
(ii) not more than thirty-six (36) feet from the nearest other
marked post; and
(2) before a purple mark that would be visible from both sides of
a fence shared by different property owners or lessees may be
applied, all of the owners or lessees of the properties must agree
to post the properties with purple marks under subsection (c)(4).
(e) A law enforcement officer may not deny entry to property or ask
a person to leave a property under subsection (b)(7) unless there is
reasonable suspicion that criminal activity has occurred or is occurring.
(f) A person described in subsection (b)(7) or (b)(10) violates
subsection (b)(7) or (b)(10), as applicable, unless the person has the
written permission of the owner, the owner's agent, an enforcement
authority, or a court to come onto the property for purposes of
performing maintenance, repair, or demolition.
(g) A person described in subsection (b)(10) violates subsection
(b)(10) unless the court that issued the order denying the person entry
grants permission for the person to come onto the property.
(h) Subsections (b), (c), and (g) do not apply to the following:
(1) A passenger on a train.
(2) An employee of a railroad carrier while engaged in the
performance of official duties.
(3) A law enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency response
personnel while engaged in the performance of official duties.
(4) A person going on railroad property in an emergency to rescue
a person or animal from harm's way or to remove an object that
the person reasonably believes poses an imminent threat to life or
limb.
(5) A person on the station grounds or in the depot of a railroad
carrier:
(A) as a passenger; or
(B) for the purpose of transacting lawful business.
(6) A:
(A) person; or
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(B) person's:
(i) family member;
(ii) invitee;
(iii) employee;
(iv) agent; or
(v) independent contractor;
going on a railroad's right-of-way for the purpose of crossing at a
private crossing site approved by the railroad carrier to obtain
access to land that the person owns, leases, or operates.
(7) A person having written permission from the railroad carrier
to go on specified railroad property.
(8) A representative of the Indiana department of transportation
while engaged in the performance of official duties.
(9) A representative of the federal Railroad Administration while
engaged in the performance of official duties.
(10) A representative of the National Transportation Safety Board
while engaged in the performance of official duties.
(i) The offense described in subsection (b)(13) is a Level 6 felony
if it is committed by a person who was convicted of criminal
trespass under subsection (b)(13) within the last five (5) years.
SECTION 18. IC 36-2-13-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) Notwithstanding any other
law, an incarcerated person may not be housed in a county jail that
does not align with the incarcerated person's sex (as defined in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22)).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, the attorney general may investigate
allegations of violations of this chapter. In addition to any civil
action filed by a taxpayer under subsection (c), the attorney
general may file a civil action to petition a court with jurisdiction:
(1) to impose a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars
($10,000) against the sheriff in charge of a county jail for each
violation of this chapter, for which the sheriff shall be
personally liable; and
(2) for injunctive relief.
The attorney general shall transfer all civil penalties collected
under this chapter to the treasurer of state for deposit in the state
general fund.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2027, an Indiana taxpayer may file a civil
action against a county jail for each violation of subsection (a).
(d) The court may award to a taxpayer who prevails in an action
under this section any of the following:
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) The greater of:
(A) actual and consequential damages resulting from the
violation; or
(B) liquidated damages of not more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) Any other appropriate relief determined by the court.
(e) It is not a defense to a civil action brought in state court
under this section that a federal district court or the United States
Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit has:
(1) declared any provision or application of this section
unconstitutional; or
(2) enjoined or restrained any state official from bringing
prosecutions under this section.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, including an
attorney or a law firm that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief to
prevent a governmental entity or person from enforcing or
bringing an action to enforce this chapter, is jointly and severally
liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney's fees of the
prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
the prevailing party incurs in its efforts to recover costs and fees.
(g) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a litigant that seeks declaratory or
injunctive relief under subsection (f), regardless of the reason
for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) the litigant that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief
under subsection (f) voluntarily dismisses a claim or cause of
action.
(h) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a person, including an attorney or a law
firm that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described by
subsection (f) not later than two (2) years after the judgment
becomes final.
(i) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (h)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
(j) If a civil action is brought under subsection (h), the action
may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(k) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (h).
(l) A governmental entity or an officer or employee of a
governmental entity is immune from any action, claim,
counterclaim, or other legal or equal action that:
(1) challenges the validity of any provision in this section; or
(2) seeks to prevent enforcement of this section;
in accordance with IC 34-13-3-3.
(m) This section may not be construed to prevent a litigant from
asserting the invalidity or unconstitutionality of a provision of
application of this section as a defense to an action, claim, or
counterclaim brought against the litigant.
(n) The provisions of this section are severable as provided in
IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 19. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The definitions
of "sex" and "gender", as added by IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22), as amended
by this act, are meant to be synonymous in the Indiana Code unless
specifically defined otherwise. The general assembly is adding
definitions of "sex" and "gender" in this act for purposes of
clarifying what has always been meant by the use of the terms in
the Indiana Code.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 20. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "state department" refers to the Indiana department
of health.
(b) The state department shall do the following:
(1) Identify each instance of a certificate of birth that contains
an altered sex classification, including pursuant to a court
order but excluding a change made due to a clerical error,
that is inconsistent with the definition of "sex" set forth in
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22), as amended by this act.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152


(2) Reissue each certificate of birth identified in subdivision
(1) with the sex classification that is consistent with the
definition set forth in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22), as amended by this
act.
(3) Void the superseded document.
(c) The bureau of motor vehicles and the department of labor
shall share with the state department any data that includes an
address for any individual for which a birth certificate is required
to be reissued under this SECTION. The state department shall
share with the bureau of motor vehicles the name of any birth
certificate that is being reissued so that the bureau may take any
action necessary concerning that information.
(d) This SECTION expires December 31, 2028.
SECTION 21. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "state department" refers to the Indiana department
of health.
(b) Before December 31, 2026, the state department shall update
the definition of "sex" that the state department uses as an agency
to the definition set forth in IC 1-1-4-5(a)(22), as amended by this
act.
(c) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 22. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 215—LS 6939/DI 152